tr: Oyuncak tren ölçeği: G (1:22.5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Diğer
ru: Масштаб игрушечного поезда: G (1:22,5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Другое
sl-SI: Merilo igralnega vlaka: G (1:22,5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Drugo
nb: Skala for leketog: G (1:22,5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Annet
fr: Échelle des trains miniatures: G (1:22.5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Autre
th: มาตราส่วนรถไฟของเล่น: G (1:22.5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); อื่นๆ
pl: Skala modelu pociągu: G (1:22,5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Inne
it: Scala del treno giocattolo: G (1:22,5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Altro
fi: Lelujunan mittakaava: G (1:22,5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Muu
nl: Schaal speelgoedtrein: G (1:22,5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Overig
sk-SK: Mierka hračkárskeho vláčika: G (1:22,5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Iné
ko: 장난감 기차 스케일: G(1:22.5); HO(1:87); N(1:160); O(1:48); OO(1:76); S(1:64); T(1:450); TT(1:120); Z(1:220); 기타
el: Κλίμακα σιδηροδρόμου παιχνιδιού: G (1:22.5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Άλλο
pt-BR: Escala do trem de brinquedo: G (1:22.5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Outro
es: Escala del tren de juguete: G (1:22,5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Otro
vi: Tỷ lệ của mô hình tàu hỏa đồ chơi: G (1:22.5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Khác
bg-BG: Мащаб на моделно влакче: G (1:22,5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Друго
cs: Měřítko hračkového vlaku: G (1:22,5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Jiné
da: Skala for legetøjstog: G (1:22,5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Andet
lt-LT: Žaislinio traukinio mastelis: G (1:22.5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Kita
pt-PT: Escala do comboio de brincar: G (1:22,5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Outro
hu: Játékvonat léptéke: G (1:22,5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Egyéb
hr-HR: Mjerilo modela vlakića: G (1:22,5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Ostalo
zh-TW: 玩具火車比例: G (1:22.5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); 其他
ja: トイ鉄道スケール: G (1:22.5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); その他
en: Toy train scale: G (1:22.5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Other
zh-CN: 玩具火车比例: G (1:22.5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); 其他
ro-RO: Scară a trenulețului de jucărie: G (1:22,5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Altele
sv: Skala för leksakståg: G (1:22,5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Övrigt
de: Maßstab des Spielzeugzugs: G (1:22,5); HO (1:87); N (1:160); O (1:48); OO (1:76); S (1:64); T (1:450); TT (1:120); Z (1:220); Sonstiges